src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-panj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - paņ: # Noun 104 'eng /est pang/fin' - full paradigm
     paņ+N+Sg+Nom: paņ
     paņ+N+Sg+Gen: paņ
     paņ+N+Sg+Par: paņņõ
     paņ+N+Sg+Dat: paņņõn
     paņ+N+Sg+Ins: paņņõks
     paņ+N+Sg+Ill: paņņõ
     paņ+N+Sg+Ela: paņštõ
     paņ+N+Pl+Nom: pǭņõd
     paņ+N+Pl+Gen: pǭņõd
     paņ+N+Pl+Par: pǭņidi
     paņ+N+Pl+Dat: pǭņõdõn
     paņ+N+Pl+Ins: pǭņõdõks
     paņ+N+Pl+Ill: pǭņiž
     paņ+N+Pl+Ela: pǭņist
